Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1901
Act, how cited.

Sections 28-1901 to 28-1908 shall be known and may be cited as the Crush Transnational Repression in Nebraska Act.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 14.